District of Columbia statutes.
29-1001.07

Requirements of other laws.

(a)

This chapter shall not alter or amend any law that governs the licensing and regulation of an individual or entity in carrying on a specific business or profession even if that law permits the business or profession to be conducted by a limited cooperative association, a foreign cooperative, or its members.

(b)

A limited cooperative association shall not conduct an activity that, under law of the District other than this chapter, shall be conducted only by an entity that meets specific requirements for the internal affairs of that entity unless the organic rules of the association conform to those requirements.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 109 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.